Illinois, session 104th, SB425.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Educational Partnership Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 40/1)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2201)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Educational Partnership Act.9(Source: P.A. 84-712.)